src/phon-smj.xfst
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==================================== !
! Phonological converter for Lule Sámi !
! ==================================== !

! To eventual curious readers
! This file tries out conversion from Sámi orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon SAMPA. There is a switch at the end to get IPA instead.

! Usage: Compile sme as usual:
! make TARGET=sme
! Pipe text through the analyser:
! cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT bin/phon-sme.fst | ..

!We may also add POS tagging:
! cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/pos-sme.fst | tr '\t' '+' | cut -d"+" -f1,3 | uniq | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | l

! In order to make this better we should uniq the closed POS before giving them
! to the phonological analyser (TODO: Check whether output is ok).

! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dat lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sme-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

!define POSTAG %+N -> %+N,
!              %+A -> %+A, 
!              %+V -> %+V,
!              %+Adv -> %+X, 
!              %+Pron -> %+X,
!              %+CS -> %+X,
!              %+CC -> %+X,
!              %+Adp -> %+X,
!              %+Po -> %+X,
!              %+Pr -> %+X,
!              %+Interj -> %+X,
!              %+Pcle -> %+X,
!              %+Num -> %+X, 
!              %+CLB -> %+CLB ;


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>



define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
                   é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | 
                   â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
                   É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | 
                   Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ; 

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ ] ;

define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


! SecondaryLenghtening

echo << Rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, 
              G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, 
              Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, 
              U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Ž -> ž, Æ -> æ, 
              Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö, Ä -> ä  ] ;




echo << Rules >>


! Here comes the other rules


define ijRule  i -> j || Vow _ ;

define slRule s -> š || [.#.|%#|%-] _ l ;


define StrongGrade    m %^ b -> m m %^ p ,
                      m %^ p -> m m %^ M p ,
                      m %^ s -> m m %^ s ,
                      m %^ v -> m m %^ v ,
                      m %^ š -> m m %^ š ,
                      
                      s %^ p -> s s %^ p ,
                      s %^ t -> s s %^ t ,
                      s %^ k -> s s %^ k ,
                      s %^ m -> s s %^ m ,
                      
                      š %^ p -> š š %^ p ,
                      š %^ t -> š š %^ t ,
                      š %^ k -> š š %^ k ,
                      š %^ m -> š š %^ m ,
                      
                      n %^ c -> n n %^ N t s ,
                      n %^ d -> n n %^ t ,
                      n %^ g -> ŋ ŋ %^ k ,
                      n %^ j -> n n %^ j ,
                      n %^ k -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k ,
                      n %^ s -> n n %^ s ,
                      n %^ t -> n n %^ N t ,
                      n %^ v -> n n %^ v ,   
                      n %^ z -> n n %^ t s ,
                      n %^ č -> n n %^ N t š ,
                      n %^ š -> n n %^ š ,
                      n %^ ž -> n n %^ t š ,
                      l %^ r -> l ə %^   r ,
                      l %^ b -> l ə %^   p ,   
                      l %^ f -> l ə %^   f ,   
                      l %^ g -> l ə %^   k , 
                      l %^ j -> ʎ   %^   j ,   
                    l l %^ j -> ʎ ʎ %^   j ,   
                      l %^ k -> l ə %^ h k , 
                      l %^ p -> l ə %^ h p ,   
                      l %^ s -> l ə %^   s ,   
                      l %^ v -> l ə %^   v ,   
                      l %^ š -> l ə %^   š , 
                      l %^ z -> l ə %^ d s , 
                      l %^ ž -> l ə %^ d š , 
                      l %^ t -> l l %^ L t ,
                      l %^ d -> l l %^   t ,
                      l %^ c -> l l %^ L t s ,
                      l %^ č -> l l %^ L t š ,
        
                      r %^ b -> r ə %^   p ,
                      r %^ d -> r ə %^   t ,
                      r %^ f -> r ə %^   f ,
                      r %^ g -> r ə %^   k ,
                      r %^ j -> r ə %^   j ,
                      r %^ k -> r ə %^ h k ,
                      r %^ p -> r ə %^ h p ,
                      r %^ s -> r ə %^   s ,
                      r %^ t -> r ə %^ h t ,
                      r %^ v -> r ə %^   v ,
                      r %^ š -> r ə %^   š ,
                      r %^ z -> r ə %^   d s ,
                      r %^ ž -> r ə %^   d š ,
                      r %^ c -> r ə %^ h t s,
                      r %^ č -> r ə %^ h t š ,
        
                      đ %^ b -> đ ə %^ p , 
                      đ %^ g -> đ ə %^ k , 
                      đ %^ j -> đ ə %^ j , 
                      đ %^ v -> đ ə %^ v                
                              || [.#.|%-] (Syll Syll) Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;

define olju ʎ %^ j -> l ə %^ j || [.#.|%^] (s) o _ u , 
                                  [.#.|%^]  p  u _ a  ,
								[.#.|%^]  b  u _ o  ;

define FinalLightT t -> h ||  _ .#. ;
define FinalLightD d -> h || Vow  j   _ .#. ;

define sClusterWeak s p %^ p -> s %^ p || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    s t %^ t -> s %^ t || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    s k %^ k -> s %^ k || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    s m %^ m -> s %^ m || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    š p %^ p -> š %^ p || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    š t %^ t -> š %^ t || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    š k %^ k -> š %^ k || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    š m %^ m -> š %^ m || Vow _ Vow ; 

define StopCluster  k %^ c -> k k %^ h t s || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    k %^ č -> k k %^ h t š || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    k %^ t -> k k %^ h t   || Vow _ Vow ;
define tkRule       t %^ k -> t t %^ h k   || Vow _ Vow ;
define tmRule       t %^ m -> t t %^ h m   || Vow _ Vow ;

define 3rdSylld d -> đ || .#. Syll (Cns) Vow %^ _ Vow ;
 # bo.ra.dit -> bo.ra.đih

define rSchwa r -> r ə || Vow _ %^ [ b m | d n | d n j | g ŋ ] Vow ;
define dSchwa đ -> đ ə || Vow _ %^ [ Cns - Alv | b m | d n j | g ŋ ] Vow ;
define lSchwa l -> l ə || Vow _ %^ [ Cns - Alv | b m | d n | d n j | g ŋ ] Vow ;

!áhč^či -> áhh^či
define Preaspiration c -> h || h _ %^ c ,, 
                     č -> h || h _ %^ č ,,
                     p -> h || h _ %^ p ,,
                     t -> h || h _ %^ t ,,
                     k -> h || h _ %^ k ;

define jPreaspiration [..] -> h || Vow Son %^ _ Stop Vow , Vow Son _ Stop %^ Stop ;


! Note IPA/SAMPA value of c in next rule!!
define LongPalatalAffricate  d %^ d j -> ɟ  %^ c  || Vow _ Vow ;
define ShortPalatalAffricate d %^ j   -> c  %^ c  || Vow _ Vow ;

define PlosiveDevoicing d -> t , g -> k , b -> p || Vow            _ %^ Nas ,,
                        d -> t , g -> k , b -> p || Vow Son (ə) %^ _    Nas ;

! Latusforlenging
define LatusLengthening a -> a a || .#. Cns* [a|e|o] (Dummy) Cns* %^ Cns _ ;

define PrimaryLenghtening h ->  h h ||
            [.#.|Cns] [ Vow - á ] _ %^ Stop [ [ [i|u] [[Cns - j]|.#.]] | á | a a] ;
! johtit -> johhtit

! Triple length?
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ i;
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ u;
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ á;

! vi må liste konsonantpar
!define TripleLength Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || Cns1 _  [ i [.#.|Cns] | u | á | a a] ;
! + lignende regler for <pp tt cc kk> osv.



! Sekundær forlenging (her må vi liste konsonantpara)
define SecondaryLengthening l r %^ r -> %^SL l r r %^ r ,
                            l b %^ b -> %^SL l p p %^ p ,   
                            l f %^ f -> %^SL l f f %^ f ,   
                            l g %^ g -> %^SL l k k %^ k ,   
                            l j %^ j -> %^SL l j j %^ j ,   
                          l h k %^ k -> %^SL l L L %^ k ,   
                          l h p %^ p -> %^SL l L L %^ p ,   
                            l s %^ s -> %^SL l s s %^ s ,   
                            l v %^ v -> %^SL l v v %^ v ,   
                            l š %^ š -> %^SL l š š %^ š , 
                          l h t %^ t -> %^SL l L L %^ t , 
                          l h c %^ c -> %^SL l L L %^ t s , 
                          l h č %^ č -> %^SL l L L %^ t š , 
                            l z %^ z -> %^SL l t t %^ t s , 
                            l ž %^ ž -> %^SL l t t %^ t š , 

                            r b %^ b -> %^SL r p p %^ p ,
                            r d %^ d -> %^SL r t t %^ t ,
                            r f %^ f -> %^SL r f f %^ f ,
                            r g %^ g -> %^SL r k k %^ k ,
                            r j %^ j -> %^SL r j j %^ j ,
                          r h p %^ p -> %^SL r R R %^ p ,
                            r s %^ s -> %^SL r s s %^ s ,
                          r h k %^ k -> %^SL r R R %^ k ,
                          r h t %^ t -> %^SL r R R %^ t ,
                          r h c %^ c -> %^SL r R R %^ t s ,
                          r h č %^ č -> %^SL r R R %^ t š ,
                            r v %^ v -> %^SL r v v %^ v ,
                            r š %^ š -> %^SL r š š %^ š ,
                            r z %^ z -> %^SL r t t %^ t s ,
                            r ž %^ ž -> %^SL r t t %^ t š ,
